Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 2. Report on Proposed Work

§ 41-9-210.
Levels, surveys and maps to be made; report to court required.

As soon as may be after the confirmation of the said preliminary report, or within such time as the court may direct, said commissioners shall proceed to have all necessary levels taken and surveys made, and shall lay out said proposed work, make a map thereof and plans, profiles and other specifications thereof, and report in writing to the court.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 39; C.S. 1920, § 1034; R.S. 1931, § 122-838; C.S. 1945, § 71-1501; W.S. 1957, § 41-398.

§ 41-9-211.
Contents; starting points, routes and termini.

The commissioners shall report whether the starting point, routes and termini of the proposed work and the proposed location thereof, as in the petition contained, are in all respects proper and feasible, and, if not, shall report such as are most proper and feasible.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 40; C.S. 1920, § 1035; R.S. 1931, § 122-839; C.S. 1945, § 71-1502; W.S. 1957, § 41-399.

§ 41-9-212.
Contents; change of boundaries generally.

If it be found necessary to change the boundaries of said proposed district, as by them previously fixed, they shall report said proposed change, and, if possible, shall report the names, residence and post-office addresses of the owner or owners of all lands affected by said change in boundaries, but no such change in boundaries shall be made as to deprive the court of jurisdiction; provided, however, that if the owners of lands adjacent to the district petition to have their lands brought into the district such may be considered the same as original petitioners in making changes of boundaries.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 41; C.S. 1920, § 1036; R.S. 1931, § 122-840; C.S. 1945, § 71-1503; W.S. 1957, § 41-400.

§ 41-9-213.
Contents; assessment of damages.

The commissioners shall report what lands within the district will be injured by the proposed work, if any, and they shall therein award to each tract, lot, easement or interest by whomsoever held, the amount of damages which they shall determine will be caused to the same by the proposed work.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 42; C.S. 1920, § 1037; R.S. 1931, § 122-841; C.S. 1945, § 71-1504; W.S. 1957, § 41-401.

§ 41-9-214.
Contents; assessment of benefits.

The commissioners shall report what lands within the district will be benefited by the proposed work and they shall assess against each tract, lot and easement by whomever held the amount of benefits which they determine will be caused to the same by the proposed work. The benefits so assessed are herein referred to as “assessment of benefits”.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 43; C.S. 1920, § 1038; R.S. 1931, § 122-842; C.S. 1945, § 71-1505; W.S. 1957, § 41-402.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits approved by court, without notice for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 41-9-215.
Contents; cost of construction.

The commissioners shall also determine and report to the court the total amount, as near as they can determine, what said proposed work will cost, which cost shall include all incidental expenses, the reasonable cost of organizing said district, the costs of proceeding, and all probable damage to lands, both within and without the district, together with a reasonable sum for attorney fees for the petitioners, and such sum as the commissioners may deem necessary to provide for possible defaults and delinquencies in payment of assessments, which cost will hereinafter be referred to as “cost of construction”.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 44; C.S. 1920, § 1039; Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-843; C.S. 1945, § 71-1506; W.S. 1957, § 41-403.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits approved by court, without notice for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 41-9-216.
Contents; assessments upon particular tracts, lots and corporations.

If the cost of construction of any particular part of the work so proposed to be done should be assessed upon any particular tract or tracts, lot or lots of land, or upon any corporation or corporations, the commissioners shall so specify, and in their report shall fix and determine the sums which should be assessed against said tracts, lots and corporations, and assess such sum against said tracts, lots and corporations.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 45; C.S. 1920, § 1040; R.S. 1931, § 122-844; C.S. 1945, § 71-1507; W.S. 1957, § 41-404.

Cross references. —

As to assessments, etc., generally, see §§

41-9-240

through

41-9-259

.

§ 41-9-217.
Contents; assessments for construction generally.

They shall apportion and assess the part of this “cost of construction,” not assessed as above, against the several benefited tracts, lots and easements in said drainage district, in proportion to the benefits which they have assessed against the same, by setting down opposite each tract, lot or easement, the sum which they assess against the same for construction. The assessments which together make up the cost of construction, as above defined, are herein referred to as “assessments for construction”.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 47; C.S. 1920, § 1042; R.S. 1931, § 122-846; C.S. 1945, § 71-1509; W.S. 1957, § 41-405.

Cross references. —

As to assessments, etc., generally, see §§

41-9-240

through

41-9-259

.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits approved by court, without notice for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 41-9-218.
Contents; special benefits to corporations.

If any corporation would, in the judgment of said commissioners, derive special benefits from the whole or any part of such proposed work, the commissioners shall so report and assess those benefits, and assess against the same its proportionate share of the costs of said proposed work. The word “corporation” wherever in this act contained, shall be construed to include:

Railroad companies;

Other private corporations of all kinds;

Towns;

Cities;

Villages; and

Other drainage districts.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 46; C.S. 1920, § 1041; R.S. 1931, § 122-845; C.S. 1945, § 71-1508; W.S. 1957, § 41-406.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see note to §

41-9-110

.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits approved by court, without notice for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 41-9-219.
Contents; costs of repairs.

The commissioners shall further report to the court the probable cost of keeping said proposed work in repair after it is completed.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 48; C.S. 1920, § 1043; R.S. 1931, § 122-847; C.S. 1945, § 71-1510; W.S. 1957, § 41-407.

§ 41-9-220.
Contents; maps and plans.

They shall include in their said report, said map, plans and other specifications, and file the same with their report.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 49; C.S. 1920, § 1044; R.S. 1931, § 122-848; C.S. 1945, § 71-1511; W.S. 1957, § 41-408.

§ 41-9-221.
Commissioners not to be confined to plans in petition.

The commissioners shall not be confined to the points of commencement, routes or termini of the drains or ditches, or the number, extent or size of the same, or the location, plan or extent of any levee, ditch or other work, as proposed by the petitioners, but shall locate, design, lay out and plan the same in such manner as to them shall seem best, to promote the public health or welfare, and to drain, or to protect the lands of the parties interested with the least damage and the greatest benefit to all lands affected thereby. And any plan proposed by the commissioners, may, on the application of any person interested, on the hearing hereinafter provided for, or on the application of the commissioners, be altered by the court, by written order, in such manner as shall appear to the court to be just.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 50; C.S. 1920, § 1045; R.S. 1931, § 122-849; C.S. 1945, § 71-1512; W.S. 1957, § 41-409.

Cross references. —

As to petition generally, see §

41-9-101

et seq.

§ 41-9-222.
Changing boundaries upon application to court; filing of report.

If the commissioners find that the proposed district, as described in the petition filed, will not embrace all of the lands that will be benefited by the proposed work, or that it will include lands that will not be benefited and are not necessary to be included in said district for any purpose, they shall extend or contract the boundaries of the proposed district so as to include or exclude all such lands, as the case may be; and the boundaries adopted and reported by them, may, upon the hearing of their report, as hereinafter provided, upon their application, or that of any person interested, be altered by the court in such manner as shall appear to be just; provided, that the alteration of boundaries as aforesaid shall not have the effect of so far enlarging or contracting the proposed district as to render such petition void or dismissible. Said report shall be filed with the clerk of the court.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 51; C.S. 1920, § 1046; R.S. 1931, § 122-850; C.S. 1945, § 71-1513; W.S. 1957, § 41-410.

§ 41-9-223.
Notice of hearings on report; contents; order for hearing.

Upon the filing of said report, the court shall make and enter an order fixing the time and place when and where all persons interested may appear and remonstrate against the confirmation thereof, and the clerk of said court shall cause notice of the time and place of such hearing to be given to all parties interested, which notice shall contain a brief description of the lands benefited and damaged, together with the net damage awarded to the several tracts, parcels, easements and corporations to which damages are awarded, and the sum in each case assessed for construction against said several benefited parcels, tracts, easements and corporations.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 52; C.S. 1920, § 1047; R.S. 1931, § 122-851; C.S. 1945, § 71-1514; W.S. 1957, § 41-411.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits, approved by court, without notice, for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 41-9-224.
Notice of hearings on report; publication and service generally.

Said notice shall be published for at least three (3) successive weeks, prior to the day set for the hearing in one (1) newspaper published in each county in which said lands, or any part thereof within said district are situate (and if no newspaper is published in said county, in some newspaper in an adjoining county), and by serving a copy of such notice on each of the persons or corporations, by said report recommended to be assessed, or whose lands are by said report recommended to be included in said district, and who resides in any of the counties out of which the proposed district is formed, at least twenty (20) days before the day of hearing in the same manner that a summons is required to be served; provided, absence from the county of such person or corporation shall excuse personal service, whereupon due publication of such notice shall be sufficient service.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 53; C.S. 1920, § 1048; R.S. 1931, § 122-852; C.S. 1945, § 71-1515; W.S. 1957, § 41-412.

§ 41-9-225.
Notice of hearings on report; when land situated in several counties.

In case the lands are situated in more than one (1) county the notice published in the county wherein the court having jurisdiction is situated shall contain a description of all the lands in said proposed district, the damages awarded to the several parcels thereof and amounts assessed for construction against the several parcels thereof, but the notice published in any other county or counties may contain a description of only the lands situate in said county for which said publication is made, together with the damages awarded to and assessments for construction against the several tracts, parcels, easements and interests situate in said county for which publication is made.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 54; C.S. 1920, § 1049; R.S. 1931, § 122-853; C.S. 1945, § 71-1516; W.S. 1957, § 41-413.

§ 41-9-226.
Notice of hearings on report; effect of personal service.

In case of service of said notice personally, or the acceptance and waiver thereof on all the owners of the lands within the district, said service shall be sufficient and give the court jurisdiction without said publication.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 55; C.S. 1920, § 1050; R.S. 1931, § 122-854; C.S. 1945, § 71-1517; W.S. 1957, § 41-414.

§ 41-9-227.
Hearings; modification of report generally.

If the court finds that the report requires modification the same may by order of the court be referred back to the commissioners, who may be required to modify it in any respect.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 56; C.S. 1920, § 1051; R.S. 1931, § 122-855; C.S. 1945, § 71-1518; W.S. 1957, § 41-415.

§ 41-9-228.
Hearings; confirmation order generally; appeal.

If there be no remonstrance, or if the finding be in favor of the validity of the proceedings, or after the report shall have been modified to conform to the findings, the court shall confirm the report and the order of confirmation shall be final and conclusive, the proposed work shall be established and authorized, and the proposed assessments approved and confirmed unless within thirty (30) days an appeal be taken to the supreme court, the said order of confirmation shall also fix the commissioners’ bond.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 57; C.S. 1920, § 1052; R.S. 1931, § 122-856; C.S. 1945, § 71-1519; W.S. 1957, § 41-416.

§ 41-9-229.
Hearings; modification of combination order.

Said order of confirmation may, at the same or at any subsequent term of said court, be revised, modified or changed, in whole or in part, on petition of the commissioners, after such notice as the court may require, to parties adversely interested.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 58; C.S. 1920, § 1053; R.S. 1931, § 122-857; C.S. 1945, § 71-1520; W.S. 1957, § 41-417.

§ 41-9-230.
Hearings; supplemental report; amending original report.

At any time prior to making the order confirming said report or thereafter the court may permit the commissioners to present and file a supplemental report, or amend their report, as to any matter which, pursuant to the provisions hereof, was or might have been included in the original report presented by them, and after reasonable notice given to all parties interested, in such manner as the court shall direct, the court may, upon the hearing in said matter make such order as the case may require.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 59; C.S. 1920, § 1054; R.S. 1931, § 122-858; C.S. 1945, § 71-1521; W.S. 1957, § 41-418.

§ 41-9-231.
Judgment; entry when petition on proceedings dismissed.

In case the petition or proceedings are dismissed as provided in W.S.

41-9-132

, a judgment shall be entered against the petitioners and in favor of the commissioners for the costs, expenses, and liabilities incurred in said proceedings, but for the benefit of those who have rendered services or advanced money in the prosecution of said proceedings, or have recovered costs on successful contests therein.

In case the proceedings are dismissed at any time, or the district is discontinued for any cause subsequent to the time provided in W.S.

41-9-132

, a judgment shall be entered against the owners of all the lands then within the boundaries of said drainage district and in favor of the commissioners for all costs, expenses and liabilities incurred in said proceedings up to and including the time of said dismissal or said discontinuance, but for the benefit of those who have rendered service, or advanced money in connection with said drainage district, or have recovered costs on successful contests herein.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 60; 1915, ch. 155, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 1055; R.S. 1931, § 122-859; C.S. 1945, § 71-1522; W.S. 1957, § 41-419.

§ 41-9-232.
Judgment; filing of statement of costs; hearing.

Before any judgment is entered, said commissioners shall file with the clerk of the district court, in which said proceedings were instituted, an itemized statement of such costs and expenses, duly verified, upon which an order shall issue, requiring said petitioners to show cause before said court, at a time and place named, why judgment should not be entered against said petitioners for the amount of said costs and expenses. Notice of the hearing on said order to show cause, shall be given to said petitioners, by mailing to each a copy thereof, to their last known post-office address, at least twenty (20) days prior to the time set for hearing, and by publication of the same in one (1) or more newspapers, published in the county, where the proceedings are pending, at least three (3) successive weeks prior to the day set for such hearing. Said notice need not contain an itemized statement of said account.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 61; C.S. 1920, § 1056; R.S. 1931, § 122-860; C.S. 1945, § 71-1523; W.S. 1957, § 41-420.

§ 41-9-233.
Judgment; contributions for payment prorated.

All petitioners shall, among themselves, contribute in the payment of said judgment, in proportion to the number of acres of land they have within the boundaries of the proposed district at the time of the filing of said petition.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 62; C.S. 1920, § 1057; R.S. 1931, § 122-861; C.S. 1945, § 71-1524; W.S. 1957, § 41-421.